Washington statutes.
RCW 36.54.140

County ferry districts—Excess levies.

A ferry district may impose excess levies upon the property included within the district for a one-year period to be used for operating or capital purposes whenever authorized by the electors of the district under RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

[ 2003 c 83 s 304.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Captions, part headings not law—Severability—Effective date—2003 c 83: See notes following RCW 36.57A.200.